Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,257
Priority items; priority foundation items; designation.

Priority items are designated in the Food Code. Priority foundation items are designated in the Food Code.

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 250, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB74, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB835, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 5.